Hawaii statutes.
§461-1 Definitions. For the purposes
of this chapter:

"Board" means the board of pharmacy
of the State except where another meaning is clearly manifested by the context.

"Continuing education courses" means
courses approved by the Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education.

"Cosmetics", which includes
"soap", "dentifrice", and "toilet article",
means:

(1) Articles intended to be rubbed, poured, or
sprinkled on, introduced into, or otherwise applied to the human body, or any
part thereof, for cleansing, beautifying, or promoting attractiveness; and

(2) Articles intended for use as a component of any
such articles.

"Credit hour", except as otherwise
provided, means the value assigned to sixty minutes of instruction.

"Director" means the director of
commerce and consumer affairs.

"Drug" means:

(1) Articles recognized in the official United States
pharmacopoeia, official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or
official national formulary, or any supplement to any of them;

(2) Articles intended for use in the diagnosis, cure,
mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in human beings or animals;

(3) Articles (other than food or clothing) intended
to affect the structure or any function of the body of human beings or animals;
and

(4) Articles intended for use as a component of any
articles specified in paragraph (1), (2), or (3), above; provided that the term
"drug" shall not include devices or their components, parts, or
accessories, cosmetics, or liquor as defined in section 281-1.

"Emergency contraception" means a
drug that:

(1) Is used postcoitally;

(2) Prevents pregnancy by delaying ovulation,
preventing fertilization of an egg, or preventing implantation of an egg in a
uterus; and

(3) Is approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration.

"Encumbered license" means a license
issued by any state or territory of the United States for the practice of
pharmacy which is revoked, suspended, or made probationary or conditional by
the licensing or registering authority in the respective jurisdiction as a
result of disciplinary action.

"Institutional facility" means an
organization or facility whose primary purpose is to provide a physical
environment for patients to obtain health care services or at-home care
services, and that uses the services of an on-site pharmacy, an off-site
pharmacy, or a pharmacist contractor at which medication storage is managed by
personnel of the facility. "Institutional facility" includes but is
not limited to a:

(1) Hospital;

(2) Convalescent home;

(3) Skilled nursing facility;

(4) Intermediate care facility;

(5) Extended care facility;

(6) Rehabilitation center;

(7) Health maintenance organization clinic;

(8) Psychiatric center;

(9) Intellectual disability center;

(10) Penal institution;

(11) Hospice facility;

(12) Supervised living group; or

(13) Prescribing practitioner's office.

"Licensed physician" means a
physician or osteopathic physician licensed by the Hawaii medical board
pursuant to chapter 453.

"Medical oxygen" means the
prescription drug oxygen.

"Medical oxygen distributor" means
any person, including a prescription drug wholesale distributor, who
distributes or dispenses medical oxygen pursuant to a prescription.

"Pharmacy" means every store, shop,
or place:

(1) Where prescription drugs are dispensed or sold at
retail, or displayed for sale at retail;

(2) Where practitioners' prescriptions or drug
preparations are compounded;

(3) That has upon it, displayed within it, or affixed
to or used in connection with it, a sign bearing the words
"pharmacist", "pharmacy", "apothecary",
"drug store", "druggist", "drugs",
"medicines", "medicine store", "drug sundries",
"remedies", or any words of similar or like import; or

(4) Where any of the above words or combination of
words are used in any advertisement.

The term "pharmacy" shall not include any
medical oxygen distributor.

"Practice of pharmacy" means:

(1) The interpretation and evaluation of prescription
orders; the compounding, dispensing, and labeling of drugs and devices (except
labeling by a manufacturer, packer, or distributor of nonprescription drugs and
commercially legend drugs and devices); the participation in drug selection and
drug utilization reviews; the proper and safe storage of drugs and devices and
the maintenance of proper records therefor; the responsibility for advising
when necessary or where regulated, of therapeutic values, content, hazards, and
use of drugs and devices;

(2) Performing the following procedures or functions
as part of the care provided by and in concurrence with a "health care
facility" and "health care service" as defined in section
323D-2, or a "pharmacy" or a licensed physician or a licensed
advanced practice registered nurse with prescriptive authority, or a
"managed care plan" as defined in section 432E-1, in accordance with
policies, procedures, or protocols developed collaboratively by health
professionals, including physicians and surgeons, pharmacists, and registered
nurses, and for which a pharmacist has received appropriate training required
by these policies, procedures, or protocols:

(A) Ordering or performing routine drug
therapy related patient assessment procedures;

(B) Ordering drug therapy related laboratory
tests;

(C) Initiating emergency contraception oral
drug therapy in accordance with a written collaborative agreement approved by
the board, between a licensed physician or advanced practice registered nurse
with prescriptive authority and a pharmacist who has received appropriate
training that includes programs approved by the American Council of
Pharmaceutical Education (ACPE), curriculum-based programs from an
ACPE-accredited college of pharmacy, state or local health department programs,
or programs recognized by the board of pharmacy;

(D) Administering drugs orally, topically, by
intranasal delivery, or by injection, pursuant to the order of the patient's
licensed physician or advanced practice registered nurse with prescriptive
authority, by a pharmacist having appropriate training that includes programs
approved by the ACPE, curriculum-based programs from an ACPE-accredited college
of pharmacy, state or local health department programs, or programs recognized
by the board of pharmacy;

(E) Administering:

(i) Immunizations orally, by injection, or by intranasal
delivery, to persons eighteen years of age or older by a pharmacist having
appropriate training that includes programs approved by the ACPE,
curriculum-based programs from an ACPE-accredited college of pharmacy, state or
local health department programs, or programs recognized by the board of
pharmacy; and

(ii) Vaccines to persons between fourteen and
seventeen years of age pursuant to section 461-11.4;

(F) As authorized by the written instructions
of a licensed physician or advanced practice registered nurse with prescriptive
authority, initiating or adjusting the drug regimen of a patient pursuant to an
order or authorization made by the patient's licensed physician or advanced
practice registered nurse with prescriptive authority and related to the
condition for which the patient has been seen by the licensed physician or
advanced practice registered nurse with prescriptive authority; provided that
the pharmacist shall issue written notification to the patient's licensed
physician or advanced practice registered nurse with prescriptive authority or
enter the appropriate information in an electronic patient record system shared
by the licensed physician or advanced practice registered nurse with
prescriptive authority, within twenty-four hours;

(G) Transmitting a valid prescription to
another pharmacist for the purpose of filling or dispensing;

(H) Providing consultation, information, or
education to patients and health care professionals based on the pharmacist's
training and for which no other licensure is required; or

(I) Dispensing an opioid antagonist in
accordance with a written collaborative agreement approved by the board,
between a licensed physician and a pharmacist who has received appropriate
training that includes programs approved by the American Council on
Pharmaceutical Education (ACPE), curriculum-based programs from an
ACPE-accredited college of pharmacy, state or local health department programs,
or programs recognized by the board; and

(3) The offering or performing of those acts,
services, operations, or transactions necessary in the conduct, operation,
management, and control of pharmacy.

"Practitioner" means an individual
licensed by the State or authorized by the laws of the State to prescribe
prescription drugs within the scope of the person's practice.

"Prescription" means an order or
formula issued by a practitioner licensed by the State or authorized by the
laws of the State to prescribe prescription drugs within the scope of the
practitioner's practice, for the compounding or dispensing of drugs or an order
or formula issued by an out-of-state practitioner in compliance with chapter
328.

"Prescription drug" means any drug
dispensed, distributed, or sold pursuant to a practitioner's order.

"Registered pharmacist" means a
person licensed under this chapter to practice in a pharmacy except where
another meaning is clearly manifested by the context.

"Remote dispensing". DELETED.

"Remote dispensing machine" means a
device used for dispensing unit-of-use drugs that is operated using information
technologies and is located in a remote dispensing pharmacy.

"Remote dispensing pharmacy" means
the area in an institutional facility, including a federally qualified health
center that provides outpatient medical care in any county, where prescription
drugs are dispensed through the use of a remote dispensing machine.

"Remote dispensing technician". DELETED.

"Responsible pharmacy". DELETED.

"Territory" means Puerto Rico, the
Northern Mariana Islands, the Virgin Islands, Guam, or American Samoa.

"Unit of use container" means one
that contains a specific quantity of a drug product and that is intended to be
dispensed as such without further modification except for the addition of
appropriate labeling. A unit of use container is labeled as such. [L 1949, c
175, pt of §1; RL 1955, §71-1; am L 1964, c 15, §4; HRS §461-1; am L 1986, c
143, §4; am L 1987, c 188, §1; am L 1995, c 34, §1; am L 1996, c 202, §11; am L
1997, c 214, §8; am L 2000, c 83, §6; am L 2002, c 256, §2; am L 2003, c 201,
§2; am L 2004, c 165, §2, c 190, §§6, 11 and c 239, §1; am L 2008, c 9, §3 and
c 212, §§3, 7; am L 2009, c 11, §62 and c 96, §3; am L 2010, c 50, §2 and c 51,
§2; am L 2011, c 220, §12; am L 2012, c 24, §2 and c 42, §3; am L 2013, c 184,
§2; am L 2015, c 36, §1; am L 2016, c 68, §3 and c 183, §9]

Note

The L 2012, c 24, §2 amendment applies to license renewals
for the licensing biennium beginning January 1, 2014. L 2012, c 24, §4.

The L 2010, c 51 amendment is exempt from the January 2, 2014
repeal and reenactment condition of L 2009, c 96, §3. L 2010, c 51, §5.

Law Journals and Reviews

Emergency Contraception in Religious Hospitals: The Struggle
Between Religious Freedom and Personal Autonomy. 27 UH L. Rev. 65 (2004).

Compelled Expression of the Religiously Forbidden:
Pharmacists, "Duty to Fill" Statutes, and the Hybrid Rights
Exception. 29 UH L. Rev. 97 (2006).

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next